Louisiana, session 2026, HB658.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:337.6(A), 337.16, 337.25, 337.64(A), and 337.80(A)(introductory
paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:337.22(F) and 337.23(J) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§337.6. Definitions
A. The following words, terms, and phrases used in this Chapter shall have
the meaning ascribed to them in this Subsection, unless the context clearly indicates
a different meaning:
(1) "Collector" means the secretary of the Department of Revenue.
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue.
(3) "Local collector" means the single collector or collection commission for
each parish.
(1) (4) "Local ordinance", for purposes of this Chapter, shall include both
ordinances and resolutions pursuant to which a political subdivision levies a sales
and use tax and otherwise provides with respect thereto.
(5) "Local taxing authority" or "taxing authority" means a political
subdivision.
(2) (6) "Political subdivision" means a parish, municipality, and any other
unit of local government, including a school board and a special district, authorized
by law to levy and collect a sales and use tax.
(3) (7) "Secretary" or "secretary of revenue" means the secretary of the
Department of Revenue for the state of Louisiana.
* * *
§337.16. Authority to collect local sales and use taxes; state central collection
A. The secretary of the Department of Revenue is hereby authorized to
contract with all the governing authorities of any taxing authority, at the request of
the subdivisions, to collect and enforce the collection of any sales and use tax, and
related penalty, interest, or other charge, levied by the taxing authorities. In order
to collect and enforce any such tax, the secretary is vested with all the power and
authority conferred by this Title. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, beginning July 1, 2027, all sales and use taxes levied by a local taxing
authority shall be collected by the state through the secretary of revenue. The
secretary shall adopt rules and regulations and prescribe forms for the collection of
local taxes consistent with the provisions of this Part.
B. The contract between the Department of Revenue and such taxing
authorities shall be executed by the secretary of the Department of Revenue and the
proper official or officials of the governing authorities of the taxing authorities. The
contract shall provide the manner, the charges and costs of collection, if any, to be
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
paid by the taxing authorities, and such other terms and conditions necessary to
effectuate the contract. The secretary shall establish a program for the collection and
distribution of sales and use taxes levied by all local taxing authorities in the state.
The avails of these taxes are referred to hereafter in this Part as "nonstate tax
proceeds". Within the department there shall be a specific staff with the primary
responsibility of ensuring the prompt collection and remittance of nonstate tax
proceeds. A member of the staff shall be available every day of the year,
twenty-four hours per day. The department shall provide for and maintain a system
which allows for the sharing of real time data on the collection of taxes for the
benefit of the local taxing authorities for which the taxes are collected.
C. The program shall provide for the transmission of the nonstate tax
proceeds to each respective local collector as follows: taxes collected by electronic
means shall be transmitted within four days of receipt, and taxes collected by check
shall be transmitted within twenty days of receipt. The method for accounting and
distribution of nonstate tax proceeds shall be determined by agreement of the
secretary and the state treasurer, and nonstate tax proceeds shall not be considered
state monies and shall therefore not be subject to appropriation. The secretary shall
deduct an amount not greater than one-half of one percent of the taxes collected as
compensation for the collection service and to provide for continued support of the
staff assigned to this function. The fee to be charged for collection on behalf of each
taxing authority shall be determined by agreement of the secretary and the respective
taxing authority.
D. No later than February 1, 2027, the single collector for each parish shall
provide the secretary with a copy of all local ordinances affecting the imposition of
sales and use taxes in the parish and shall notify the secretary within ten days after
approval of any action imposing a new tax or otherwise affecting the imposition of
an existing tax. The notice shall be issued no later than seventy-five days prior to the
effective date of the change and shall specify the tax rate or base change and the time
period during which the change shall be in effect. The notice shall also include a
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
copy of the local tax ordinance and any other information as may be required by the
secretary.
E. The secretary shall cause a monthly reconciliation of the account for each
parish to be conducted. The reconciliation shall provide detailed information
regarding the amounts of tax collected and remitted to the local collector.
F.(1) On a quarterly basis, the secretary shall provide a report of the taxes
collected and the cost of collection to each separate local taxing authority for which
sales and use taxes were collected and remitted pursuant to this Section. The report
shall include the name, address, and account number of each person from whom the
secretary has collected a tax payment, or to whom he has made a refund payment or
credit, during the quarter covered by the report.
(2) Upon the request of a local taxing authority, the secretary shall make an
additional quarterly report to the taxing authority that includes the amount of tax due
from each person identified by the secretary as doing business in the jurisdiction of
the taxing authority who has failed to pay the taxes determined to be due by the
secretary. The additional report shall state whether there has been a partial tax
payment by the delinquent taxpayer and whether the taxpayer is also delinquent in
the payment of state sales and use taxes. The report shall also include an explanation
of any action taken by the secretary to collect the delinquent taxes owed to the taxing
authority.
(3) If the local taxing authority determines that a person doing business in
its jurisdiction is not included in the report, the taxing authority may provide to the
secretary the name and address of the person, and within ninety days of receipt of the
information, the secretary shall send one of the following to the taxing authority:
(a) An explanation as to why the person is not obligated to pay the tax.
(b) A statement that the person is obligated to pay the tax and that the tax is
delinquent.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
(c) A statement that the person is obligated to pay the tax, and the amount
of the tax that has been collected and credited to the taxing authority's special
account.
G. Not more than twice per year, the governing authority of a taxing
authority may request to investigate the records of the department concerning the
collection of the taxes it levies. The secretary shall acknowledge and respond to any
such request within ten days, and the investigation shall take place no more than
twenty days after the date of the secretary's response or at the convenience of the
taxing authority, whichever is later. Upon request of the taxing authority or the
secretary, the legislative auditor shall, to the degree practicable, provide assistance
to the taxing authority in the investigation of the records.
H. The provisions of this Title that apply to the collection of state sales and
use taxes shall also apply to the collection of all local sales and use taxes by the
secretary in accordance with the provisions of this Section.
I. The secretary shall have no duty or authority to in any way administer the
levy and enforcement of any tax levied by a local taxing authority. All responsibility
for administration and enforcement of sales and use taxes, including audits and the
consideration and payment of refund claims, shall remain with the local taxing
authority levying the tax.
J. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any taxpayer who
is aggrieved by an assessment of sales and use tax due when the assessment is made
by a local collector pursuant the provisions of this Chapter, or who has a claim for
a refund or credit for an overpayment of taxes, may appeal to the Board of Tax
Appeals for a redetermination of the assessment or a determination of the alleged
overpayment. The appeal shall be made in accordance with the applicable provisions
of Chapter 17 of this Subtitle.
* * *
§337.22. Sales and use tax returns
* * *
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
F. Beginning July 1, 2027, the sales and use tax return for the payment of
sales and use taxes levied by a local taxing authority shall be prescribed by the
secretary pursuant to the authority established in R.S. 47:337.16.
§337.23. Uniform electronic local return and remittance system; official record of
tax rates and exemptions; filing and remittance of local sales and use taxes;
penalties for violations; state central collection
* * *
J. Beginning July 1, 2027, the secretary shall be responsible for the
collection of any sales and use tax levied by a local taxing authority in Louisiana.
The tax return and remittance system to be employed by the secretary shall reflect
the requirements of this Section to the greatest degree practicable, and shall be
established pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
* * *
§337.25. Authority of local collectors to sue
Each local collector of each taxing authority of this state, who is charged by
law with the duty of collecting a tax as disbursed by the state, shall be the proper
party to bring suits in his official capacity for the collection of such taxes on behalf
of a local taxing authority.
* * *
§337.64. Alternative remedy for dealers
A. Any taxpayer who has received a notice of assessment for sales and use
taxes from any local collector or local taxing authority and whose remedy is to make
a payment under protest may in lieu thereof comply with the alternative provisions
of this Section, rather than making a payment under protest.
* * *
§337.80. Interest on refunds or credits
A. Each local collector shall compute on all refunds or credits and allow
interest as part of the refund or credit as follows:
* * *
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1224 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 658
Section 2. R.S. 47:337.13 and 337.14 are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, but only if the
proposed amendment of Articles VI and VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in
the Act which originated as House Bill No. ____ of this 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.